North Dakota, session 69, HB1509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-09-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-09-19. Refund of assessment.
1. To receive a refund of any assessment paid in accordance with this chapter, a
producer shall submit to the council a written request for a refund application within
sixty days after the date of the assessment or final settlement.
2. The producer shall complete thea refund application and return the application to the
council, together with a record of the assessment collected, within ninety days after
the date of the assessment or final settlement. The council shall then refund the net
amount of the assessment that had been collected within thirty days of receiving the
refund application.
2. The council shall provide the refund application form through secured electronic
means.
3. If a request for a refund is not submitted to the council within the prescribed time
period, the producer is presumed to have agreed to the assessment.
4. A producer is not entitled to a refund under this section unless the refundable amount
meets or exceeds five dollars.
Page No. 1 25.1176.02000